Mississippi statutes. Title 49. Conservation and Ecology
Chapter 13. Commercial Quail

§ 49-13-1.
Citation of chapter.

This chapter may be cited as the Mississippi Commercial Quail Law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5922-01; Laws, 1962, ch. 185, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved May 2, 1962).

§ 49-13-3.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Commission” means the Mississippi Commission on Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks.

“Department” means the Mississippi Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks.

“Pen-raised quail” means a quail that has been hatched from an egg laid by a quail confined in a pen or coop and has itself been wholly raised in a pen or coop by a duly licensed quail breeder holding a permit as provided by law from the Mississippi Commission on Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks.

“Quail” means all species of quail native to North America and coturnix quail.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 5922-02, 5922-03; Laws, 1962, ch. 185, §§ 2, 3; Laws, 1979, ch. 378, § 1; Laws, 2000, ch. 516, § 80, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 30, 2000.).

§ 49-13-5.
Who may engage in the business of propagating quail for commercial sale.

Any person, firm or corporation may engage in the business of propagating pen-raised quail for the commercial sale for consumption thereof by complying with the provisions of this chapter and may thereafter sell either live quail or the carcasses of such pen-raised quail either within or without this state.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5922-02; Laws, 1962, ch. 185, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved May 2, 1962).

§ 49-13-7.
Commercial quail breeder’s license.

A commercial quail breeder’s license must first be obtained from the commission, or its agents. The license shall be applied for each year and shall be valid from April 1 to March 31 next following, upon payment of Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) for each license. The license must bear a number as designated by the commission, and shall be conspicuously exhibited at all times at the place where quail are bred.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5922-04; Laws, 1962, ch. 185, § 4; Laws, 2000, ch. 516, § 81, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 30, 2000.).

§ 49-13-9.
Sale or transfer of quail carcasses; necessity of transfer by licensed commercial breeder; record of transfer; penalties.

The sale or transfer or ownership of any pen-raised quail carcasses must originate with a sale or transfer made by a licensed commercial quail breeder.

Each licensed quail producer shall display the license on the premises in easy view and shall keep a record of each bird sale or gift.

The record of bird transfer should include the following entries: kind and number of quail, date of ownership transfer and name and address of purchaser or gift recipient. The record of transfer of ownership must be kept current and available at all times for inspection by a representative of the department. Record discrepancies may cause the licensed quail producer to be charged with a misdemeanor.

Any individual or owner of a business establishment possessing quail from a licensed producer shall be subject to having the birds confiscated and may be charged with a misdemeanor if a record of transfer of ownership does not appear on the record book of the licensed producer from whom the person in question states that he purchased or received the birds.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5922-05; Laws, 1962, ch. 185, § 5; Laws, 1979, ch. 378, § 2; Laws, 2000, ch. 516, § 82, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 30, 2000.).

§ 49-13-11.
Packaging and labeling for transferred quail carcasses.

The carcasses of dressed pen-raised quail shall, when sold or given as a gift, be contained in a package or wrapper possessing, in plain easy-to-read print, the licensed seller’s or donor’s name, name of quail business (if used) and address. The package or wrapper may contain one or more birds.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5922-06; Laws, 1962, ch. 185, § 6; Laws, 1979, ch. 378, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1979.

§ 49-13-13.
Shipment by carrier.

When any package containing quail carcasses is to be shipped by rail, express or other carrier, public or private, the packages wherein the quail are contained must comply with the packaging or wrapping requirements set forth in Section 49-13-11 of the Mississippi Commercial Quail Law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5922-07; Laws, 1962, ch. 285, § 7; Laws, 1979, ch. 378, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1979.

§ 49-13-15.
Storage of carcasses.

If a package or shipment of quail carcasses is kept in storage in any hotel, restaurant, cafe or boardinghouse, or elsewhere, the carcasses must remain in the packages or wrappers used by the licensed quail producer until the quail are being prepared for consumption.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5922-08; Laws, 1962, ch. 185, § 8; Laws, 1979, ch. 378, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1979.

§ 49-13-17.
Records; subsequent change of ownership.

In case of the resale or disposition of quail carcasses originally purchased or received from a licensed quail producer and in turn sold or donated by another person, a record of each subsequent change of ownership must be made. The following information must be recorded by the present owner about the owner who receives the quail: name and address of the person or business to which the quail carcasses were transferred, the date of the transfer and the kind and number of quail transferred. The record of the quail transfer of ownership must be kept by the person or business selling or donating the quail for a period of one (1) year following the ownership transfer and shall, upon request, be available for inspection by a representative of the department.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5922-09; Laws, 1962, ch. 185, § 9; Laws, 1979, ch. 378, § 6; Laws, 2000, ch. 516, § 83, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 30, 2000.).

§ 49-13-19.
Records; examination and inspection.

Each person, firm or corporation, holding a commercial quail breeder’s license shall keep permanent records in a suitable, permanently bound book of all birds’ carcasses sold, to whom sold, the date of the sale, the address of the vendee or consignee and the number of carcasses sold, which record, as well as the premises of such licensed breeder, shall be subject to examination and inspection by any agent of the department or peace officer for violations of this chapter, without the issuance of any warrant upon displaying his credentials of authority to such breeder.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5922-10; Laws, 1962, ch. 185, § 10; Laws, 2000, ch. 516, § 84, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 30, 2000.).

§ 49-13-21.
Shipments into state.

Any person, firm or corporation shipping quail into this state shall be subject to the provisions of this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5922-11; Laws, 1962, ch. 185, § 11, eff from and after passage (approved May 2, 1962).

§ 49-13-23.
Penalties; suspension of license.

Any person, firm or corporation violating any provision of this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction shall be punished by a fine of not less than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) nor more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00). Multiple violations of this chapter shall be assessed fines near the maximum allowable limits. Also, a person with multiple violations of this chapter may, at the discretion of the commission, have his commercial quail breeder’s license suspended by operation of law for a period of one (1) year.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5922-12; Laws, 1962, ch. 185, § 12; Laws, 1979, ch. 378, § 7; Laws, 2000, ch. 516, § 85, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 30, 2000.).

§ 49-13-25.
Raising of quail for other than commercial sale.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall be construed to require any person, engaging in the raising of quail for purposes other than the raising of quail for commercial sale for consumption, to secure a commercial quail breeder’s license, provided such person shall not raise more than one hundred (100) such birds in any calendar year for personal consumption.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5922-13; Laws, 1962, ch. 185, § 13, eff from and after passage (approved May 2, 1962).